pt-BR: Tipo de coquetel: Daiquiri; Gin Tônica; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Outros
tr: Kokteyl türü: Daiquiri; Cin Tonik; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Diğer
fr: Type de cocktail: Daiquiri; Gin & Tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Autre
hu: Koktél típusa: Daiquiri; Gin & Tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Egyéb
ru: Тип коктейля: Дайкири; Джин-тоник; Маргарита; Мартини; Мохито; Мул; Негрони; Олд Фешен; Палома; Пина Колада; Другое
zh-CN: 鸡尾酒类型: 代基里; 金汤力; 玛格丽特; 马提尼; 莫吉托; 骡子; 尼格罗尼; 古典; 帕洛玛; 椰林飘香; 其他
it: Tipo di cocktail: Daiquiri; Gin Tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Altro
en: Cocktail type: Daiquiri; Gin & Tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Other
bg-BG: Тип коктейл: Дайкири; Джин с тоник; Маргарита; Мартини; Мохито; Мюл; Негрони; Олд Фешън; Палома; Пиня Колада; Други
hr-HR: Vrsta koktela: Daiquiri; Gin & Tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Ostalo
nb: Cocktailtype: Daiquiri; Gin & Tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Annet
zh-TW: 雞尾酒類型: 黛綺麗; 琴通寧; 瑪格麗特; 馬丁尼; 莫西多; 騾子雞尾酒; 內格羅尼; 古典雞尾酒; 帕洛瑪; 鳳梨可樂達; 其他
ko: 칵테일 종류: 다이키리; 진 토닉; 마가리타; 마티니; 모히토; 뮬; 네그로니; 올드 패션드; 팔로마; 피나 콜라다; 기타
cs: Typ koktejlu: Daiquiri; Gin s tonikem; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Jiný
de: Cocktailtyp: Daiquiri; Gin Tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Andere
vi: Loại cocktail: Daiquiri; Gin & Tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Khác
es: Tipo de cóctel: Daiquiri; Gin tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Otro
sk-SK: Typ koktailu: Daiquiri; Gin & Tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Iné
sv: Cocktailtyp: Daiquiri; Gin & Tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tipul de cocktail: Daiquiri; Gin & Tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Altele
da: Type af cocktail: Daiquiri; Gin & Tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta koktajla: Daiquiri; Gin & Tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Drugo
el: Τύπος κοκτέιλ: Daiquiri; Gin & Tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Άλλο
nl: Cocktail type: Daiquiri; Gin & Tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Overig
pl: Typ koktajlu: Daiquiri; Gin & Tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Inny
lt-LT: Kokteilio tipas: Daiquiri; Džinas su toniku; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Kita
th: ประเภทค็อกเทล: ไดคิวรี; จินและโทนิก; มาร์การิตา; มาร์ตินี; โมฮิโต; มิวล์; เนโกรนี; โอลด์แฟชั่น; พาโลมา; พินาโคลาดา; อื่นๆ
ja: カクテルタイプ: ダイキリ; ジントニック; マルガリータ; マティーニ; モヒート; ミュール; ネグローニ; オールド・ファッションド; パロマ; ピニャ・コラーダ; その他
fi: Cocktailin tyyppi: Daiquiri; Gin & Tonic; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de cocktail: Daiquiri; Gin tónico; Margarita; Martini; Mojito; Mule; Negroni; Old Fashioned; Paloma; Piña Colada; Outro